Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2846
Temporary educational permit, defined.

Temporary educational permit means a permit to practice pharmacy in a supervised educational program approved by the board.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 115;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.18;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 942.